Arkansas, session 2025, HB1621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 19, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
25-19-113. Personal information of elected constitutional officers,
judicial officials, elected county officials, and their immediate family.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Elected constitutional officer" means the Governor,
Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Auditor of State,
Treasurer of State, Commissioner of State Lands, and a member of the General
Assembly;
(2) "Elected county official" means a county judge, a justice of
the peace, a sheriff, a circuit clerk, a county clerk, an assessor, a
*LGL114*
03-17-2025 12:36:47 LGL114

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1621
coroner, a treasurer, a county surveyor, and a collector of taxes;
(3) "Elected municipal official" means a person elected to an
office in a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an
incorporated town;
(4) "Governmental entity" means a public official or employee, a
governmental agency, or any other agency or improvement district that is
wholly or partially supported by public funds or expending public funds;
(5) "Immediate family member" means:
(A) A spouse, former spouse, domestic partner, child, or
parent of an elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected
county official, or an elected municipal official;
(B) A person who has a child in common with an elected
constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected county official, or
an elected municipal official;
or
(C) A familial relative of an elected constitutional
officer, a judicial official, an elected county official, or an elected
municipal official whose permanent address is the same as that of the elected
constitutional officer, the judicial official, the elected county official,
or the elected municipal official;
(6) "Judicial official" means:
(A) An individual who is currently serving or has formerly
served by election or appointment in the following positions:
(i) Justice of the Supreme Court;
(ii) Court of Appeals judge;
(iii) Circuit court judge;
(iv) District court judge; or
(v) Administrative judge of a state agency;
(B) An Eighth Circuit Court of Appeals Judge, United States District
Court Judge, or United States Magistrate Judge in Arkansas;
or
(C) A prosecuting attorney.
(7) "Land records terminal" means any type of display, physical
or virtual, accessible by the public, for a fee or no charge, that allows
users to search and retrieve a real estate property database or geographic
record;
03-17-2025 12:36:47 LGL114

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1621
(8) "Land records website" means a public website that allows
users to search and retrieve information from a real estate property database
or to search and retrieve geographic records; and
(9) "Social media account” means an online electronic medium or
a live chat system that:
(A) Enables a user to interact with content generated by
other third-party users of the social media platform;
(B) Enables a user to create an account or profile
specific to the social media platform or to import a profile from another
social media platform; and
(C) Enables one (1) or more users to generate content that
can be viewed by another third-party user of the social media platform.
(b) A record that includes the following personal information of an
elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected county
official, an elected municipal official, or an immediate family member shall
not be deemed a public record under this chapter:
(1) A home address, including without limitation primary and
secondary addresses;
(2) A home or personal mobile telephone number;
(3) A direct telephone number of a government-issued cell phone;
(4) A private extension telephone number for judicial chambers
or a governmental office;
(5) A personal email address;
(6) A Social Security number, driver’s license number, or a
taxpayer identification number;
(7) Bank account information;
(8) Credit or debit card information;
(9) A home or other address displayed on property tax records,
including without limitation the address of a secondary residence or an
investment property where an elected constitutional officer, a judicial
official, an elected county official, an elected municipal official, or an
immediate family member resides;
(10) A license plate number or home address displayed on vehicle
registration information;
(11) Identifying information of a child of an elected
constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected county official, or
03-17-2025 12:36:47 LGL114

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1621
an elected municipal official eighteen (18) years of age or younger or whose
permanent residence is the same residence as that of an elected official, an
elected county official, or an elected municipal official;
(12) A full date of birth;
(13) A photograph of a vehicle that legibly displays the license
plate;
(14) A photograph of a residence that legibly displays the
residence address;
(15) The name and address of a high school or day care facility
attended by an immediate family member of an elected constitutional officer,
a judicial official, an elected county official, or an elected municipal
official;
(16) The name and address of an employer of an immediate family
member of an elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected
county official, or an elected municipal official;
(17) The name and address of a place of worship attended by an
elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected county
official, an elected municipal official or an immediate family member of an
elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an elected county
official, or an elected municipal official; or
(18) Voter registration information or the contents of any
application for an absentee voter ballot.
(c)(1) A governmental entity shall not post or display the personal
information under subsection (b) of this section of an elected constitutional
officer, a judicial official, an elected county official, an elected
municipal official or an immediate family member in a manner that is
available to the public:
(A) Free of charge or for a fee in written or electronic
form; or
(B) On a social media account, governmental entity
website, land records terminal, or land records website.
(2)(A) If a governmental entity posts or displays personal
information of an elected constitutional officer, a judicial official, an
elected county official, an elected municipal official, or an immediate
family member under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the elected
constitutional officer, the judicial official, the elected county official,
03-17-2025 12:36:47 LGL114

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1621
or the elected municipal official may send a written request to the
governmental entity to remove the personal information.
(B) Upon receiving a written request under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section, the governmental entity shall remove the personal
information within three (3) days of the request.

/s/Wardlaw





























03-17-2025 12:36:47 LGL114